Utah statutes.
72-7-110.   Memorial signs honoring highway patrol officers.

(1) (a)  The Utah Department of Transportation may erect memorial signs along state highways, honoring Utah Highway Patrol officers who have been killed in the line of duty.

(b)  The memorial signs shall:

(i)  be located in the community of the fallen trooper that the memorial is intended to honor; and

(ii)  correlate with, and where possible conform to, the sign requirements in the most recent edition of the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways adopted under Section 41-6a-301.

(2)  Memorial signs erected in accordance with this section shall be funded by:

(a)  any voluntary contributions the department receives for the memorial signs;

(b)  funds appropriated by the Legislature to the department for memorial signs under this section; or

(c)  a combination of the funds available under Subsections (2)(a) and (b).

